Wisconsin, session 2025, AB569.
do enact as follows:AB569,13Section 1. 100.172 of the statutes is created to read:AB569,2,21100.172 Requirements for the resale of entertainment event tickets. 2(1) Definitions. In this section:AB569,2,83(a) “Bot” means any machine, device, computer program, or computer 4software that, on its own or with human assistance, bypasses security measures or 5access control systems on a retail entertainment event ticket purchasing platform, 6or other controls or measures on a retail entertainment event ticket purchasing 7platform that assist in implementing a limit on the number of entertainment event 8tickets that can be purchased, to purchase entertainment event tickets.AB569,2,119(b) “Fan club” means a membership-based program, primarily established by 10a venue, performing artist, or performer, that offers presale opportunities before a 11public offering for sale of entertainment event tickets.AB569,2,1412(c) “Resale” means the 2nd or subsequent sale of an entertainment event 13ticket by any method, including by in-person transaction, telephone, mail, email, 14facsimile, or electronic means through a website or mobile application.AB569,2,1615(d) “Reseller” means a person engaged in the resale of entertainment event 16tickets.AB569,2,2217(e) “Primary entertainment event ticket seller” means, with respect to an 18entertainment event ticket, any person that has the right to sell the entertainment 19event ticket prior to or at the primary sale of the entertainment event ticket, 20including the event organizer or any person that provides services to conduct or 21facilitate the primary sale of entertainment event tickets by or on behalf of the 22event organizer.AB569,2,2423(f) “Secondary entertainment event ticket exchange” means an electronic 24marketplace enabling the sale, purchase, and resale of entertainment event tickets.AB569,3,51(g) “Speculative entertainment event ticket” means an entertainment event 2ticket not in the actual or constructive possession of a reseller at the time of the 3ticket’s listing, sale, or advertisement, including an entertainment event ticket not 4owned by the reseller or under contract to be transferred to the reseller at the time 5of the ticket’s sale.AB569,3,106(2) Entertainment event ticket disclosure requirements. (a) A 7primary entertainment event ticket seller, secondary entertainment event ticket 8exchange, entertainment event ticket issuer, or reseller shall clearly and 9conspicuously disclose at the time of listing an entertainment event ticket all of the 10following:AB569,3,12111. The total price of the ticket, including all fees and taxes and any additional 12charges other than shipping costs.AB569,3,17132. Unless the primary entertainment event ticket seller, secondary 14entertainment event ticket exchange, entertainment event ticket issuer, or reseller 15is a nonprofit organization, an itemized breakdown of all components of the total 16price of the ticket, as specified in subd. 1., including all fees and taxes and any 17additional charges other than shipping costs.AB569,3,19183. The seat number or section of the ticket, if applicable, based on the venue’s 19seating arrangement, except in the following instances:AB569,3,2220a. The ticket is part of a flexible series ticketing option that allows an attendee 21to commit to a number of performances in advance while choosing the specific 22performances at a later date.AB569,3,2423b. The ticket is part of a season ticket package in which individual tickets are 24not individually priced.AB569,4,21c. The ticket is for a special fundraising event presented by a nonprofit venue 2operator or event presenter.AB569,4,73(b) A primary entertainment event ticket seller, secondary entertainment 4event ticket exchange, entertainment event ticket issuer, or reseller shall clearly 5and conspicuously disclose to an entertainment event ticket purchaser prior to final 6purchase of the ticket the total price of the ticket, including the information 7required under par. (a).AB569,4,108(3) Prohibition on speculative entertainment event ticket sales. A 9reseller may not sell or offer for sale a speculative entertainment event ticket, or an 10entertainment event ticket not in the reseller’s possession and ownership.AB569,4,1411(4) Presale restrictions. (a) No primary entertainment event ticket seller, 12reseller, or secondary entertainment event ticket exchange or any 3rd-party 13affiliate thereof may resell an entertainment event ticket before the ticket has been 14made available to the public through an initial sale.AB569,4,1715(b) No reseller or secondary entertainment event ticket exchange or any 3rd-16party affiliate thereof may participate in a fan club ticket presale or sell or offer for 17sale an entertainment event ticket sold through a fan club program.AB569,4,2218(5) Preserving performing artists’ ability to disincentivize price 19gouging. No person may restrict a consumer from transferring an entertainment 20event ticket to another person unless the terms and conditions of the restrictions on 21transferability are provided to the consumer prior to purchase and the consumer 22acknowledges receipt of such disclosure prior to purchase.AB569,5,323(6) Refund requirements. An entertainment event ticket issuer, secondary 24entertainment event ticket exchange, or reseller directly engaged in a transaction 1with a purchaser of an entertainment event ticket shall provide a full refund of the 2ticket, including all fees and taxes paid by the purchaser, within 10 days of a refund 3request, if any of the following conditions are met:AB569,5,44(a) The ticket is counterfeit.AB569,5,55(b) The event for which the ticket is sold is canceled.AB569,5,76(c) The ticket does not conform to the description provided for the ticket at the 7time of purchase. AB569,5,98(d) The date or time of the entertainment event is moved and the 9entertainment event ticket issuer offers a refund to ticket purchasers.AB569,5,1410(7) Ban on deceptive URLs and improper use of intellectual property. 11No secondary entertainment event ticket exchange, reseller, or operator of any 12website purporting to sell or offer for sale entertainment event tickets that link or 13redirect to a secondary entertainment event ticket exchange or reseller may do any 14of the following:AB569,5,2015(a) Use any performing artist name, venue name, event organizer name, 16graphic, marketing logo, image, or other intellectual property of a performing 17artist, venue, or event organizer, including using any proprietary resemblance of 18the venue where an event occurs in promotional materials, social media 19promotions, or URLs of the secondary entertainment event ticket exchange, 20reseller, or website.AB569,6,221(b) State or imply that the secondary entertainment event ticket exchange, 22reseller, or website is affiliated with or endorsed by a venue or performing artist, 23including by using words such as “official” in promotional materials, social media 24promotions, search engine optimization, paid advertising, URLs, or search engine 1monetization unless the secondary entertainment event ticket exchange, reseller, or 2website has the express written consent of the venue or performing artist.AB569,6,53(8) Prohibition on circumvention of internet entertainment event 4ticket sales limitations. (a) Prohibited Actions. No person may create a bot to 5perform any of the following actions:AB569,6,761. Purchase entertainment event tickets for any single Internet 7entertainment event ticket sale.AB569,6,1082. Use multiple Internet protocol addresses, purchaser accounts, or email 9addresses to purchase more than 8 entertainment event tickets for any single 10Internet entertainment event ticket sale.AB569,6,13113. Circumvent or disable an electronic queue, waiting period, presale code, or 12other sales volume limitation system associated with an Internet entertainment 13event ticket sale.AB569,6,15144. Circumvent or disable a security measure, access control system, or any 15other control or measure used to facilitate authorized entry to an event.AB569,6,1916(b) Reporting requirements for primary entertainment event ticket sellers. 1. A 17primary entertainment event ticket seller shall report any known circumvention or 18attempted circumvention of the prohibitions specified in par. (a) to the department 19within 48 hours of discovery.AB569,6,20202. A report under subd. 1. shall include all of the following:AB569,6,2121a. A description of the incident, including the nature of the circumvention.AB569,6,2222b. Any available information about the individuals or entities involved.AB569,6,2323c. Measures taken or planned to prevent further circumvention.AB569,7,2243. A primary entertainment event ticket seller shall retain all relevant 1records of an incident under subd. 1. for a period of one year and make the records 2available to the department upon request.AB569,7,63(9) Price cap on secondary entertainment event ticket exchange. (a) 4No reseller or secondary entertainment event ticket exchange may sell an 5entertainment event ticket with a fee that exceeds 10 percent of the ticket’s total 6initial price.AB569,7,107(b) If an entertainment event ticket at initial sale was purchased for a series 8of events, such as a season entertainment event ticket for a sports team, the total 9resale price of an entertainment event ticket for a single event may not exceed the 10total price of a comparable entertainment event ticket, including all fees and taxes.AB569,7,1211(10) Penalties and enforcement. (a) Any person who violates this section 12engages in an unfair and deceptive trade practice in violation of s. 100.20.AB569,7,1413(b) A person who violates this section is subject to all of the following civil 14forfeitures: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab569 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab569 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB569 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB569 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB569: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting